Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-2806
Grants; total amount.

The department may award up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars in grants from the Workforce Development Program Cash Fund for purposes of carrying out the Manufacturing Modernization and Workforce Development Pilot Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB265, § 6.